Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1101
Legislative grant of charter; reservation of power to change.

Fontenelle Forest Association is hereby authorized to organize as a corporation not for profit under the provisions of the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act. Upon so organizing, it shall have all of the powers and immunities provided for by such act and shall in all respects be subject to the provisions of such act, and for all purposes shall be deemed the successor to Fontenelle Forest Association as now organized and constituted.

Laws 1913, c. 176, § 1, p. 531;

R.S.1913, § 714;

C.S.1922, § 623;

C.S.1929, § 24-1101;

R.S.1943, § 21-1101;

Laws 1969, c. 125, § 1, p. 576;

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 179.

Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, see section 21-1901.